Washington statutes.
RCW 35.44.420

Property donations—Credit against assessments.

A city legislative authority may give credit for all or any portion of any property donation against an assessment, charge, or other required financial contribution for transportation improvements within a local improvement district. The credit granted is available against any assessment, charge, or other required financial contribution for any transportation purpose that uses the donated property.

[ 1987 c 267 s 9.]

NOTES:

Right-of-way donations: Chapter 47.14 RCW.